Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2247.01
Services; authorized; standards applicable.

(1) A person may retain or employ a real property appraiser credentialed under the Real Property Appraiser Act to perform valuation services. In each case, the valuation services specific to real property appraisal practice, including any report, shall comply with the Real Property Appraiser Act and the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice.

(2) In a valuation assignment, the real property appraiser shall remain an impartial, disinterested third party. When providing an evaluation assignment, the real property appraiser may respond to a client's stated objective but shall also remain an impartial, disinterested third party.

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 51;

Laws 1994, LB 1107, § 45;

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 39;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 67;

Laws 2007, LB186, § 24;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 67;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 37;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 88.